Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-735.03
Election contests; Election Act applicable.

If an election is contested involving a sanitary and improvement district board of trustees, the Election Act shall apply.

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 17;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 551.

Election Act, see section 32-101.